Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1521.09
Hazardous waste; commercial hazardous waste management facility; notice of intent to apply for permit; fee; site review committee; director; appoint designee.

(1) Commencing on June 30, 1988, any person who desires a permit for a commercial hazardous waste management facility shall, at least one hundred eighty days prior to making application therefor, file a notice of intent with the director on a form provided by the director. The notice of intent shall include such information as prescribed by the director and shall be accompanied by a fee established by the department in an amount sufficient, but not in excess of the amount necessary, to pay the department for the direct and indirect costs of processing the notice of intent and to pay the costs and expenses specified in section 81-1521.12. Within fifteen days of receipt of a notice of intent, the director shall notify the appropriate local officials and shall establish a specific site review committee. The purpose of establishing the committee shall be to provide for early public involvement in the consideration of a proposed facility.

(2) The director may appoint a designee to carry out duties assigned to the director related to a notice of intent or an application for a permit except the duty to make the decision required by section 81-1521.19. If the applicant is an individual, the application shall include the applicant's social security number.

Laws 1987, LB 114, § 3;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 225.